New Jersey, session 222, A4950.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    For the purposes of P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs. "Driveway" means a private roadway providing access to a public street or highway, including any pathway necessary to access the driveway from the residential property that is eligible to receive snow removal services under a local senior snow removal program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). "Entrance way" means a private pathway providing access to the abutting sidewalks from the residential property that is eligible to receive snow removal services under a local senior snow removal program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). "Fund" means the Senior Snow Removal Grant Program Fund established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). "Qualified senior" means a person 62 years of age or older with a household income not exceeding 65 percent of the area median income for the area in which the municipality is located. 2.    There is established in the Department of Community Affairs a nonlapsing fund to be known as the Senior Snow Removal Grant Program Fund.  Monies deposited into the fund shall be used to provide grants to municipalities to create and implement local senior snow removal programs.  A grant awarded to a municipality from the fund shall not exceed $100,000. 3.    a.   A municipality may establish by ordinance a local senior snow removal program for removal of snow and ice from the entrance ways, driveways, and abutting sidewalks of a residential property located within the municipality that is occupied by one or more qualified seniors. b.    A municipality that establishes a local senior snow removal program pursuant to subsection a. of this section may apply, in a form and manner determined by the department, for a grant from the Senior Snow Removal Grant Program Fund for the operation of the local senior snow removal program. c.     (1)        State grant money provided to a municipality to operate a local senior snow removal program shall not be made available to otherwise qualified seniors living in a rental unit, the lease of which requires the landlord to provide snow and ice removal equivalent to that provided under the local senior snow removal program. (2)   State grant money provided to a municipality to operate a local senior snow removal program shall not be made available to otherwise qualified seniors living in a unit in a residential condominium, cooperative, fee simple community, horizontal property regime, or mobile home park comprised of a community trust or other trust device, condominium association, homeowners' association, or council of co-owners, the governing documents of which require the entity responsible for managing the common elements and facilities of the community to provide snow and ice removal equivalent to that provided under the local senior snow removal program. 4.    In accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 5.    There is appropriated to the Senior Snow Removal Grant Program Fund, established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) from the General Fund, a sum of $2,000,000 to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.